Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-117
Order of commission; failure to comply; penalty.

Any motor carrier or regulated motor carrier as defined in section 75-302 or common carrier which fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any order of the commission shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor. Each day during which such failure, neglect, or refusal continues shall constitute a separate offense. If a motion is filed for reconsideration or to set aside the order, the carrier shall not be subject to such penalty during the pendency of such motion.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 17, p. 1360;

Laws 1989, LB 78, § 7;

Laws 1995, LB 424, § 9;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 484;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 15.